South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3861.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 1, Title 6 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 6-1-195. (A) Notwithstanding another provision of law, a governing body of a municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the State may not enact or enforce an ordinance, resolution, or regulation that prohibits the rental of a residential dwelling to a short-term guest. (B) A municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the State that enacts or enforces an ordinance, resolution, or regulation that violates the provisions of subsection (A) may not: (1) assess or collect the six percent property assessment ratio for qualifying real property pursuant to Section 12-43-220(e); and (2) the Office of the State Treasurer shall withhold the municipality's, county's, or political subdivision's State Aid to Subdivisions Act distribution until the ordinance, resolution, or regulation in violation of subsection (A) is repealed. (C) This section supersedes and preempts any ordinance, resolution, or regulation enacted by a municipality, county, or other political subdivision of the State that purports to prohibit the rental of a residential dwelling to a short-term guest. (D) For purposes of this section: (1) "Residential dwelling" means any building, structure, or part of the building or structure, that is used or intended to be used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one or more persons to the exclusion of all others. (2) "Short-term rental" means a residential dwelling that is offered for rent for a fee and for fewer than twenty-nine consecutive days. (3) "Short-term guest" means a person who rents a short-term rental. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----